District of Columbia statutes.
16-1301

Jurisdiction of District Court.

The United States District Court for the District of Columbia has exclusive jurisdiction of all proceedings for the condemnation of real property authorized by subchapters IV and V of this chapter, with full power to hear and determine all issues of law and fact that may arise in the proceedings.

Dec. 23, 1963, 77 Stat. 572, Pub. L. 88-241, § 1
July 29, 1970, 84 Stat. 557, Pub. L. 91-358, title I, § 145(f)(1)
Alley and street closings, acquisition authority, see § 9-203.02.
Assessment officials as expert witnesses in condemnation proceedings, see § 14-308.
Establishment of building lines on streets, acquisition authority, see § 6-403.
Insanitary buildings, condemnation, see § 6-901 et seq.
Low income housing, acquisition authority, see § 6-101.01.
Municipal center, acquisition authority, see § 10-601.
Parks, parkways and playgrounds, acquisition authority, see § 2-1009.
Pipeline rights of way, acquisition procedure, see § 34-2401.27.
Public roads, condemnation of materials for making and repairing, see § 9-1219.01.
Railroad company, acquisition authority, see § 9-1203.06.
Refuse incinerators, site acquisition authority, see § 8-705.
Subways or viaducts and approaches, acquisition authority, see § 9-1201.15.
Telegraph and telephone companies, acquisition authority, see § 34-1921.08.
This section is referenced in § 9-1203.06.
1981 Ed., § 16-1301.
1973 Ed., § 16-1301.